Utah statutes.
63G-6a-806.   Exception for public transit district contracting with a county or municipality.

A public transit district, organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act, may, without going through a standard procurement process or an exception to a standard procurement process described in Part 8, Exception to Procurement Requirements:

(1)  contract with a county or municipality to receive money from the county or municipality; and

(2)  use the money described in Subsection (1) to fund a transportation project or a transit-related program in accordance with rules made by the applicable rulemaking authority.



Enacted by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

